New York, session 2025-2026, S7174.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The correction law is amended by adding a new section 188 2 to read as follows: 3 § 188. Adjustment of earnings of incarcerated individuals; unjust 4 conviction. 1. (a) Any incarcerated individual who is employed pursuant 5 to the provisions of this article shall be entitled to a retroactive 6 adjustment in their rate of compensation where such incarcerated indi- 7 vidual is subsequently (i) pardoned upon the grounds of innocence of the 8 crime or crimes for which such incarcerated individual was sentenced and 9 which are the grounds for the fine, restitution or reparation; or (ii) 10 such incarcerated individual's judgment of conviction was reversed or 11 vacated, and the accusatory instrument dismissed or, if a new trial was 12 ordered, either such incarcerated individual was found not guilty at the 13 new trial or such defendant was not retried and the accusatory instru- 14 ment dismissed; provided that the judgment of conviction was reversed or 15 vacated, and the accusatory instrument was dismissed, on any of the 16 following grounds: (1) paragraph (a), (b), (c), (e) or (g) of subdivi- 17 sion one of section 440.10 of the criminal procedure law; or (2) subdi- 18 vision one (where based upon grounds set forth in clause one of this 19 subparagraph), two, three (where the count dismissed was the sole basis 20 for the imprisonment complained of) or five of section 470.20 of the 21 criminal procedure law; or (3) comparable provisions of the former code 22 of criminal procedure or subsequent law; or (4) the statute, or applica- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04092-01-5 S. 7174 2 1 tion thereof, on which the accusatory instrument was based violated the 2 constitution of the United States or the state of New York. 3 (b) Such compensation adjustment shall be the greater of: 4 (i) the current minimum wage of the state; 5 (ii) the current wage or industry standard wage of the trade or indus- 6 try that such incarcerated individual was actively employed in or 7 trained/certified to work in; or 8 (iii) the wage equivalent of the incarcerated individual's salary at 9 the time of conviction. 10 2. Within ninety days following the notice of adjudication for such 11 pardon, reversal or vacation pursuant to subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of 12 paragraph (a) of subdivision one of this section, the department shall 13 notify such formerly incarcerated individual of their right to receive a 14 compensation adjustment pursuant to the provisions of this section. 15 3. Within ninety days of providing notice pursuant to subdivision two 16 of this section, the department shall remit to such formerly incarcerat- 17 ed individual any moneys owed as adjusted compensation as well as an 18 accounting, including the method of accounting, for all such moneys. 19 4. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any moneys 20 remitted to a formerly incarcerated individual pursuant to the 21 provisions of this section shall not diminish or impair any compensation 22 or award which may be available to such formerly incarcerated individual 23 pursuant to the provisions of section eight-b of the court of claims 24 act. 25 § 2. Subsection (i) of section 601 of the tax law is relettered 26 subsection (j) and a new subsection (i) is added to read as follows: 27 (i) Adjusted compensation of formerly incarcerated individuals. 28 Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a), (b), (c) and (d) of 29 this section and any other provision of this article, for taxable years 30 beginning after the effective date of this subsection, the income of an 31 individual received pursuant to the provisions of section one hundred 32 eighty-eight of the correction law shall be exempt from tax under this 33 article regardless of whether such income is subject to federal income 34 taxation. 35 § 3. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 36 have become a law.